Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.400

Decision making by panel of arbitrators.

In arbitral proceedings with more than one arbitrator, any decision of the arbitral tribunal shall be made, unless otherwise agreed by the parties, by a majority of all its members. However, questions of procedure may be decided by a presiding arbitrator, if so authorized by the parties or all members of the arbitral tribunal.

[ 2015 c 276 s 40.]